Florida, session 2026, SB1278.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 11 12 Section 1.âParagraph (b) of subsection (2) of section 13 448.095, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 14 448.095âEmployment eligibility.â 15 (2)âEMPLOYMENT VERIFICATION.â 16 (b)1.âA public agency shall use the E-Verify system to 17 verify a new employeeâs employment eligibility as required under 18 paragraph (a). 19 2.âBeginning on July 1, 2026 2023, a private employer with 20 25 or more employees shall use the E-Verify system to verify a 21 new employeeâs employment eligibility as required under 22 paragraph (a). 23 3.âEach employer required to use the E-Verify system under 24 this paragraph must certify on its first return each calendar 25 year to the tax service provider that it is in compliance with 26 this section when making contributions to or reimbursing the 27 stateâs unemployment compensation or reemployment assistance 28 system. An employer that voluntarily uses the E-Verify system 29 may also make such a certification on its first return each 30 calendar year in order to document such use. 31 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.